West Virginia, session 2026, HB5075.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 3. Division of COrrections and Rehabilitation. §15A-3-7. Compensation of employees; traveling and other expenses. (a) The commissioner shall, in accordance with the provisions of §29-6-1 et seq. of this code, approve the salaries of all employees of the division. Salaries shall be commensurate with their duties and responsibilities, but no meals or other emoluments of any kind shall be furnished, given, or paid to the employee as all or part of their salary. The employees may be provided meals, household facilities, and supplies as may be necessary for them to perform their duties, if the employees agree to pay the reasonable cost as established by the commissioner. In the event of an emergency, such as a riot or other disturbance, the commissioner may authorize meals to be provided to employees at no cost. Additionally, the commissioner may establish a procedure to reimburse employees reasonable costs in the event the employee’s personal property is stolen or damaged by an inmate or resident. All persons employed under this article are entitled to be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses.(b) Non-uniformed workers within the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall enjoy a 15 percent raise to their current wages upon passage of this bill.